Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Subchapter 2. Election, Duties, and Powers of Officers of Essex Junction School District

§ 11-2.1.
Officers.

The officers shall be a Moderator, five Prudential Committee members composing the Prudential Committee, a Clerk-Treasurer who shall be the same person, and a Collector of Taxes. All officers shall be chosen from legally qualified voters in the District.

§ 11-2.2.
Election and terms of officers.

The Moderator and the five Prudential Committee members shall be elected at the annual meeting or on the day following. A Moderator shall be elected every year and shall serve a term of one year. The Moderator’s term of office shall commence on July 1
following his or her election, and shall terminate at midnight, June 30, following election of a successor. One or more persons shall be elected to the Prudential Committee each year. Effective as of the 1994 annual meeting, one of
the two seats scheduled that year for election to the Prudential Committee shall be for a term of two years. Effective as of the 1995 annual meeting, one of the two seats scheduled that year for election to the Prudential Committee
shall be for a term of two years. All other newly elected Prudential Committee members shall hold office for three year terms. Prudential committee members shall be elected by Australian ballot on the day following the annual meeting
as set forth in Vermont law. All officers, excepting the Moderator, the Clerk-Treasurer, and the Collector of Taxes, shall hold office for terms commencing upon their election and terminating upon the election of their successor. The
Clerk-Treasurer and the Collector of Taxes shall each be appointed by the Prudential Committee for a term of one year. The appointment shall be made following elections every year and before July 1st. The Clerk-Treasurer and the Collector
of Taxes shall each be appointed for a term commencing July 1 following appointment and terminating at midnight on June 30 following the appointment of a successor.

§ 11-2.3.
Vacancies.

When an officer resigns, dies, becomes incapacitated, or removes residency from the District, such office shall be considered vacant. When a vacancy occurs in any office, other than the office of Moderator, Clerk-Treasurer, and Collector of Taxes, the
Prudential Committee shall forthwith, by appointment, in writing, fill such a vacancy until the election of a successor at the annual meeting next thereafter. At such annual meeting, the voters of the School District shall fill the
vacancy in any elected office, other than the office of Moderator, for the remainder of the term. When the office of the Moderator, Clerk-Treasurer, or Collector of Taxes becomes vacant, the Prudential Committee shall forthwith by
appointment, in writing, appoint a Moderator, Clerk-Treasurer, or Collector of Taxes to fill such vacancy until midnight of June 30 following election of a successor, in the case of the Moderator’s office, or appointment of a successor,
in the case of the Clerk-Treasurer’s office or the Collector of Taxes’ office. All appointments under this section shall be filed and recorded in the office of the Clerk-Treasurer. No person shall be appointed to fill a vacancy in
office who would not be eligible for election to such office.

§ 11-2.4.
Bonding of officers.

A Prudential Committee member shall not be a Clerk-Treasurer or Collector of Taxes. Before entering upon their duties, the Collector of Taxes and Clerk-Treasurer shall give a bond to the District conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties
in such sums as may be required. When the Collector or Clerk-Treasurer for ten days neglects to give a bond as required, the office shall be vacant.

§ 11-2.5.
Board of Civil Authority.

The Moderator, Prudential Committee, Clerk-Treasurer, and Justices of the Peace residing in the District shall constitute a Board of Civil Authority in the District. The Board of Civil Authority shall have the same authority and power to abate taxes as
the board of civil authority in towns. The Board of Civil Authority shall be responsible for conducting elections and shall decide all questions as to the eligibility of a person to vote in a district meeting. The members of the Board
of Civil Authority present and acting at any meeting shall constitute a quorum in which to act.

§ 11-2.6.
Moderator.

The Moderator shall preside at the District meeting and in his or her absence, a Moderator Pro Tempora may be elected. As the presiding officer at District meetings, the Moderator shall perform the same duties and have the same authority as moderators
at town meetings.

§ 11-2.7.
Clerk-Treasurer.

The Clerk-Treasurer of Essex Junction School District shall keep a record of the proceedings of the District and shall have the power to certify the copies of the same and shall perform the duties and have the authority and powers incident to clerks and
treasurers of other municipal corporations. All money belonging to the District shall be paid to the Clerk-Treasurer, be safely kept, and paid out by the Clerk-Treasurer only upon orders issued by the Prudential Committee, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter.

§ 11-2.8.
Collector of Taxes.

Except as modified by this charter, the Collector of Taxes shall perform the same duties and have the same authority and power in the collection of taxes as those given by law to collectors of taxes and collectors of delinquent taxes in towns.